Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.2584

Service agent—Registration certificate—Revocation, suspension, refusal to renew—Appeal.

(1) The department may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the official registration certificate of any service agent for any of the following reasons:

(a) Fraud or deceit in obtaining an official registration certificate under this chapter;

(b) A finding by the department of a pattern of intentional fraudulent or negligent activities in the installation, inspection, testing, checking, adjusting, or systematically standardizing and approving the graduations of any weighing or measuring instrument or device;

(c) Knowingly placing back into commercial service any weighing or measuring instrument or device that is incorrect;

(d) A violation of any provision of this chapter; or

(e) Conviction of a crime or an act constituting a crime under the laws of this state, the laws of another state, or federal law.

(2) A service agent may appeal the department's decision to revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the service agent's registration.

[ 2019 c 96 s 9; 2000 c 171 s 62; 1995 c 355 s 17. Formerly RCW 19.94.035.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.